Tennessee, session 114, SB1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-132(c), is amended by adding
the following language as a new subdivision (3):
(3)
(A) Upon approaching a slow-moving or stationary farm tractor or
instrument of husbandry that is in an adjacent lane or on the shoulder of the road
or highway and that displays a slow-moving vehicle indicator, a person who
drives an approaching vehicle shall, proceeding with due caution, reduce the
speed of the vehicle while maintaining a safe speed for road conditions, and, if
possible, make a lane change with due regard to safety and traffic conditions.
(B) For purposes of this subdivision (c)(3), "slow-moving vehicle
indicator" includes:
(i) The use of flashing hazard lights;
(ii) The display of two (2) red flags or two (2) fluorescent orange
flags, or a combination of such flags, that are each at least eighteen
inches (18") square, made of cloth, synthetic, or man-made material; or
(iii) A slow-moving vehicle sign that is a reflective orange triangle.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1144
002833
- 1 -